Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.090

Docking horses—Misdemeanor.

Every person who shall cut or cause to be cut, or assist in cutting the solid part of the tail of any horse in the operation known as "docking," or in any other operation for the purpose of shortening the tail or changing the carriage thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1901 c 146 s 6; RRS s 3189. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 840; 1871 p 103 s 1; RRS s 3206, now codified as RCW 16.52.095.]